Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5535.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1111. (1) To qualify for a plumbing contractor license, the an applicant must either hold a master plumber license or employ the holder of a master plumber license as his or her the applicant's representative. (2) Only an individual who is a sole proprietor, a partner in a partnership, an officer of a corporation, or a member of a limited liability company may apply for licensure as a plumbing contractor. (3) The department shall issue a plumbing contractor's license to an individual who does all of the following: (a) Files a completed application on a form provided by the department that includes the following information: (i) A statement listing that lists the complete address of each place where the applicant has resided and has been engaged in business during the last 5 years including the length of time at each residence and types of businesses engaged in or employments. If the applicant is registered as a plumbing inspector under article 10 and engaged in business as a plumbing contractor under this article, the statement must include the address where the applicant has engaged in business as a plumbing inspector. (ii) The name of the individual who is applying for the license, the name of the business, and the location of the place for which the license is desired. (iii) The name of the business owner, president of the corporation, or a member or manager of the limited liability company and the name of the individual who is applying, if different from the name of the business owner, president, or member or manager and his or her the individual's title. (iv) The name, residence address, and license number of the licensed master plumber who represents the person. (b) Pays the applicable examination fee established under section 207 and passes an examination provided for by the board and the department. (c) Pays the license fee described in article 4. (4) A licensed plumbing contractor may operate 1 or more branch offices in this state under the same business if a licensed master plumber is in charge and has the responsibility of supervision at each branch. (5) If a license is issued to a plumbing contractor represented by a master plumber, the plumbing contractor and the master plumber are jointly and severally responsible for exercising the supervision or control of the plumbing operations necessary to secure full compliance with this article, the rules promulgated under this article, and all other laws and rules related to the installation of plumbing. (6) Both a person, unless the person is a plumbing contractor, and the master plumber are jointly and severally responsible for exercising the supervision or control of the plumbing operations necessary to secure full compliance with this article, the rules promulgated under this article, and all other laws and rules related to the installation of plumbing. (7) If a plumbing contractor is represented by a licensed master plumber who ceases to represent the plumbing contractor, the plumbing contractor has 30 days after the date the master plumber no longer represents the plumbing contractor in which to designate another licensed master plumber as the representative of the plumbing contractor. The plumbing contractor shall notify the department in writing of the change. (8) A licensed plumbing contractor shall display in a conspicuous place at the entrance of the place of business a sign that states the name of the business and the name of the licensed master plumber and license number in letters that are at least 3 inches high. Sec. 1123. An individual who is licensed under this article and employed or acting is registered under article 10 as a plumbing inspector shall not engage in, or be directly or indirectly connected with, the plumbing business, including, but not limited to, the furnishing of labor, materials, or appliances for the construction, alteration, or maintenance of a building or the preparation of plans or specifications for the construction, alteration, or maintenance of a building, and shall not engage in any work that conflicts with his or her official duties.is not prohibited from engaging in the business of plumbing.